Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2116
Plan; approval; findings.

(1) Following the public hearings required under section 18-2115, the governing body may approve a redevelopment plan if (a) it finds and documents in writing that the plan is feasible and in conformity with the general plan for the development of the city as a whole and the plan is in conformity with the legislative declarations and determinations set forth in the Community Development Law and (b) it finds and documents in writing that, if the plan uses funds authorized in section 18-2147, (i) the redevelopment project in the plan would not be economically feasible without the use of tax-increment financing, (ii) the redevelopment project would not occur in the community redevelopment area without the use of tax-increment financing, and (iii) the costs and benefits of the redevelopment project, including costs and benefits to other affected political subdivisions, the economy of the community, and the demand for public and private services, have been analyzed by the governing body and have been found to be in the long-term best interest of the community impacted by the redevelopment project.

(2) In connection with the approval of any redevelopment plan which includes the designation of an enhanced employment area, the governing body may approve the redevelopment plan if it determines that any new investment within such enhanced employment area will result in at least (a) two new employees and new investment of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars in counties with fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants, (b) five new employees and new investment of two hundred fifty thousand dollars in counties with at least fifteen thousand inhabitants but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants, (c) ten new employees and new investment of five hundred thousand dollars in counties with at least twenty-five thousand inhabitants but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants, (d) fifteen new employees and new investment of one million dollars in counties with at least fifty thousand inhabitants but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants, (e) twenty new employees and new investment of one million five hundred thousand dollars in counties with at least one hundred thousand inhabitants but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, (f) twenty-five new employees and new investment of two million dollars in counties with at least two hundred thousand inhabitants but fewer than four hundred thousand inhabitants, or (g) thirty new employees and new investment of three million dollars in counties with at least four hundred thousand inhabitants. Any business that has one hundred thirty-five thousand square feet or more and annual gross sales of ten million dollars or more shall provide an employer-provided health benefit of at least three thousand dollars annually to all new employees who are working thirty hours per week or more on average and have been employed at least six months. In making such determination, the governing body may rely upon written undertakings provided by any redeveloper in connection with application for approval of the redevelopment plan.

(3) This section shall not apply to a redevelopment plan that receives an expedited review under section 18-2155.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 6(9), p. 807;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1616;

Laws 1957, c. 52, § 11, p. 258;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2616;

Laws 1997, LB 875, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB562, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB1021, § 10.
November 14, 2020